Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1520
Ballot with unlawful printing; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person causing ballots to be printed with a designated heading containing a name or names not found on the official ballot having such heading or any person knowingly peddling or distributing any such ballot with the intent to have such ballot voted at any election shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 419.